Illinois, session 104th, SB1857.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 16-2 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/16-2)7    Sec. 16-2. Eligibility. A Subject to available funding, a 8foreign-born victim of trafficking, torture, or other serious 9crimes and the individual's derivative family members, but not 10a single adult without derivative family members, are eligible 11for cash assistance or SNAP benefits under this Article if the 12individual:13        (a) the individual has filed: 14            (1) has filed or is preparing to file an 15        application for T Nonimmigrant status with the 16        appropriate federal agency pursuant to Section 17        1101(a)(15)(T) of Title 8 of the United States Code, 18        or is otherwise taking steps to meet the conditions 19        for federal benefits eligibility under Section 7105 of 20        Title 22 of the United States Code; 21            (2) has filed or is preparing to file a formal 22        application with the appropriate federal agency for 23        status pursuant to Section 1101(a)(15)(U) of Title 8   SB1857- 2 -LRB104 09583 KTG 19646 b1        of the United States Code; or 2            (3) has filed or is preparing to file a formal 3        application with the appropriate federal agency for 4        status under Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United 5        States Code; and 6        (b) is otherwise eligible for cash assistance or SNAP 7    benefits, as applicable. 8    An individual residing in an institution or other setting 9that provides the majority of the individual's daily meals is 10not eligible for SNAP benefits. 11(Source: P.A. 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.